Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.14
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; petition; appraisers; appointment by court; meeting; notices.

(1) Upon the filing of a petition under section 72-240.13, the county judge or clerk magistrate, within three days by order entered of record, shall appoint three disinterested freeholders of the county, not holders of leases of school lands, to serve as appraisers. The county judge or clerk magistrate shall direct the sheriff to summon the appraisers so selected to convene in the office of the county judge at a time specified in the summons for the purpose of qualifying as appraisers and thereafter proceed to appraise the value of the permitted improvements to the land and growing crops owned by the lessee at the time of termination of the occupying tenant's lease.

(2) Notice of the appointment of the appraisers and of the time and place of the meeting of the board of appraisers to have the value of the permitted improvements to the land and growing crops assessed shall be served upon both the board and the lessee by registered or certified mail at their last-known mailing addresses at least ten days prior to the meeting of the board of appraisers.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 5, p. 1453;

Laws 1971, LB 413, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 601, § 2.